Utah statutes.
75-6-108.   Financial institution protection -- Payment on signature of one
party.
Financial institutions may enter into multiple-party accounts to the same
extent that they may enter into single-party accounts. Any multiple-party
account may be paid, on request, to any one or more of the parties. A
financial institution shall not be required to inquire as to the source of
funds received for deposit to a multiple-party account, or to inquire as to
the proposed application of any sum withdrawn from an account, for purposes of
establishing net contributions.
